California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The legislative body may in such a franchise impose such other and additional terms and conditions not in conflict with this chapter, whether governmental or contractual in character, as in the judgment of the legislative body are to the public interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

This chapter provides a procedure, alternative to the procedure provided in Article 1 of Chapter 1 of this division, for the granting of franchises by municipalities. When any proceeding is initiated under this chapter for the granting of a franchise, the provisions of this chapter exclusively govern the granting of such franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

This chapter does not apply to any municipality having a freeholders’ charter adopted and ratified under the Constitution and having in such charter provisions for the issuance of franchises by the municipality, but nothing contained in this chapter shall restrict the right of any such chartered municipality to avail itself of the provisions of this chapter wherever it may lawfully do so. The provisions of this chapter relating to the payment of a percentage of gross receipts shall not be construed as a declaration of legislative judgment as to the proper compensation to be paid a chartered municipality for the right to exercise franchise privileges therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6205, all franchises, licenses, permits, or other privileges granted to a public utility by any city, county, or city and county holding a freeholder’s charter containing provisions for the issuance of franchises, to use, or to construct or lay and use, under, along, across, or upon the public streets, ways, alleys, and places within the municipality, facilities which are part of a pipeline system transmitting oil or products thereof, shall be granted upon the terms and conditions provided in, and in accordance with, either this chapter or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6001).

(b) On and after January 1, 1990, the compensation to be paid for the franchises, licenses, permits, or other privileges granted by any city, county, or city and county, including those holding a freeholder’s charter, shall be as provided in Section 6231.5.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to preempt the ordinance of any chartered municipality insofar as that ordinance governs the granting of franchises to construct facilities which are part of a pipeline system transmitting oil or products thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1444, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Manner of Granting [6231. - 6235.]

6231.

An applicant for a franchise shall file with the legislative body of the municipality in which the franchise is desired an application stating all of the following:

(a) The name of the applicant.

(b) The purpose and term, whether definite or indeterminate, for which the franchise is desired.

(c) That the applicant if granted the franchise will pay to the municipality during the life of the franchise 2 percent of the applicant’s gross annual receipts arising from the
 use, operation, or possession of the franchise, except that this payment shall be not less than 1 percent of the applicant’s gross annual receipts derived from the sale within the limits of the municipality of the utility service for which the franchise is awarded. If the application is for a franchise complementary to a franchise derived under Section 19 of Article XI of the California Constitution as that section existed prior to its amendment on October 10, 1911, then the applicant shall pay annually, if the application is for an electric franchise, 2 percent of the applicant’s gross annual receipts arising from the use, operation, or possession of the franchise, except that this payment shall be not less than one-half of 1 percent of the applicant’s gross annual receipts from the sale of electricity within the limits of the municipality under both the electric franchises; or, if the application is for a gas, oil pipeline, or water franchise, 2 percent of the applicant’s gross annual receipts arising from
 the use, operation, or possession of the franchise, except that this payment shall be not less than 1 percent of the gross annual receipts from the sale of gas or water within the limits of the municipality under both the gas franchises or both the water franchises.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the application is for a franchise for a nonpublic utility pipeline for industrial gas or oil or products thereof, the application shall state that the applicant, if granted the franchise, will pay to the municipality during the life of the franchise either a specified percentage agreed to by the applicant and the municipality of the gross annual receipts of the applicant arising from the use, operation, or possession of the franchise or an annual franchise fee in an amount agreed to by the applicant and the municipality or an annual franchise fee computed by multiplying the sum of one-half cent ($0.005) times the nominal internal diameter of the
 pipe, expressed in inches, times the number of lineal feet of the pipe within the public streets, ways, alleys, or other public places within the municipality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6231.5.

(a) An applicant for a franchise to build and operate a pipeline system transmitting oil or products thereof shall file with the legislative body of the municipality in which the franchise is desired an application stating all of the following:

(1) The name of the applicant.

(2) The purpose and term, whether definite or indeterminate, for which the franchise is desired.

(3) That the applicant, if granted the franchise, permit, license, or other
 privilege, will pay to the municipality an annual fee computed as follows:

The length of pipe expressed in feet located within the franchised area shall be multiplied by the applicable base rate, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d), in accordance with the following schedule:Pipe size (internalBase ratediameter in inches)per lineal foot 0–4$0.088 60.132 80.176100.220120.264140.308160.352180.396200.440220.484240.528260.572280.616300.660For pipelines with an internal diameter not listed above, the fees shall be in the same proportion to the fees of a 12-inch-diameter pipe as the diameter of the unlisted pipe is to 12 inches.

(b) The annual payment for each lineal foot of pipeline shall be computed and revised each calendar year as follows:

(1) The applicable base rate shall be multiplied by the Consumer Price Index for the area, as published by the United States Department of Labor, Office of Information for the month of September immediately preceding the month in which payment is due and payable, and divided by the Consumer Price Index for June 30, 1989, which is declared to be
 100.0. Under no circumstances shall the multiplying factor be less than one.

(2) If the United States Department of Labor, Office of Information discontinues the preparation or publication of a Consumer Price Index for the area, and if no translation table prepared by the Department of Labor is available so as to make those statistics which are then available applicable to the index of June 30, 1989, the municipality shall prescribe a rate of payment which shall, in its judgment, vary from the rates specified in this section in approximate proportion as commodity consumer prices then current vary from commodity consumer prices current in December 1988. On this point, the determination by the municipality shall be final and conclusive.

(c) No fee paid to any municipality pursuant to a franchise, permit, license, or other privilege issued under an ordinance which is in effect on
 September 1, 1989, which exceeds the fee computed under this section shall be reduced. On or after January 1, 1990, a municipality may collect an additional amount which represents the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for the area during the preceding calendar year applied to that fee. The formula used in arriving at that fee shall be applicable to any replacement, modification, or extension of the pipeline. Upon expiration of a franchise, permit, license, or other privilege, the municipality may renew or extend the franchise, permit, license, or other privilege, using the local formula contained in an ordinance which is in effect on September 1, 1989. However, the fee shall not exceed the greater of the fee actually paid on September 1, 1989, or the fee computed pursuant to this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, until January 1, 1990, a municipality which is involved in eminent domain proceedings in which
 a court order for possession has been issued relating to an easement for a pipeline system transmitting oil or products thereof may adopt an ordinance setting its fee without following the provisions of this section. Upon expiration of the ordinance, the municipality may renew or extend the franchise, license, permit, or other privilege, utilizing the local formula in effect on January 1, 1990, or the fee computed pursuant to this section, whichever is greater.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the application is for a franchise for a nonpublic utility pipeline for industrial gas or oil or products thereof, the application shall state that the applicant, if granted the franchise, will pay to the municipality during the life of the franchise either of the following:

(1) A specified percentage agreed to by the applicant and the municipality of the gross
 annual receipts of the applicant arising from the use, operation, or possession of the franchise.

(2) An annual franchise fee in an amount agreed to by the applicant and the municipality, or an annual franchise fee computed by multiplying the sum of one-half of the nominal internal diameter of the pipe, expressed in inches, by the number of lineal feet of the pipe within the public streets, ways, alleys, or other public places within the municipality.

(f) Any nonpublic utility pipeline system transmitting oil or products thereof covered by subdivision (e) on December 31, 1989, that converts to public utility status shall continue to pay the fee established pursuant to subdivision (e) for the remaining term of its franchise, license, permit, or other privilege. Upon expiration of its franchise, license, permit, or other privilege, a nonpublic utility pipeline system transmitting
 oil or products thereof that has converted or seeks to convert to public utility status shall establish to the satisfaction of the franchising authority all of the following:

(1) Its property is dedicated to the service of the public.

(2) Its rates for transportation are established pursuant to tariffs filed with the Public Utilities Commission.

(3) Its accounts and records are established pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(4) It has filed an appropriate annual report with the commission.

(5) Its rates for transportation are just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory, as evidenced either by an order of the commission approving those rates, or an application for
 approval of its rates that is pending with the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1444, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6232.

Upon receipt of the application the legislative body of the municipality may pass its resolution declaring its intention to grant the franchise applied for, stating the character of the franchise, setting forth a notice of the day, hour, and place when and where all persons having any objection to the granting thereof may appear before the legislative body and be heard thereon, and directing the clerk of the legislative body to publish the notice at least once within fifteen (15) days after the passage of the resolution in a newspaper of general circulation within the municipality.

The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than
 twenty (20) nor more than sixty (60) days after the date of the passage of the resolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6233.

The notice of the time and place of hearing objections shall state that the grantee of the franchise and its successors and assigns will, during the life of its franchise, pay to the municipality the percentage specified in its application, that the percentage will be paid annually from the date of the granting of the franchise, and in the event such payment is not made the franchise will be forfeited. The notice shall also designate the term, whether definite or indeterminate, for which the franchise is proposed to be granted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6234.

At any time not later than the hour set for the hearing of objections, any person interested may make written protest stating objections against the granting of the franchise. The protest shall be signed by the protestant and be delivered to the clerk of the legislative body. At the time set for hearing objections the legislative body shall proceed to hear and pass upon all protests so made and its decision shall be final and conclusive, subject to the right of referendum of the people. The legislative body may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

If no protest in writing is delivered to the clerk up to the hour set for hearing, or
 such protests as are filed have been heard and determined by the legislative body to be insufficient, or have been overruled or denied, the legislative body may grant the franchise. The franchise shall be granted by ordinance adopted in the manner prescribed by law for the enactment of ordinances by the granting body.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6235.

A franchise granted under this chapter does not become effective until the grantee files written acceptance thereof with the clerk of the granting municipality. When so filed the acceptance constitutes a continuing agreement by the grantee that if and when the granting municipality thereafter annexes, or consolidates with, additional territory, all franchises, rights and privileges owned by the grantee therein, except a franchise derived under Section 19 of Article XI of the Constitution as that section existed prior to the amendment thereof adopted October 10, 1911, shall be deemed abandoned within the limits of the additional territory.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Scope of Franchise [6261. - 6265.]

6261.

Any franchise granted under this chapter with respect to a given utility service is in lieu of all other franchises, rights, or privileges owned by the grantee, or by any successor of the grantee to any rights under the franchise, for transmitting and distributing the utility service within the limits of the municipality as such limits exist at the time of the granting of the franchise or as they may thereafter exist except any franchise derived under Section 19 of Article XI of the Constitution as that section existed prior to the amendment thereof adopted October 10, 1911. The acceptance of any such franchise granted under this chapter shall operate as an abandonment of all such franchises, rights, and privileges within the limits of such municipality as such limits at any time exist, in lieu of which the franchise is granted under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6262.

No franchise granted under this chapter in any way impairs or affects the right of the granting municipality to acquire the property of the grantee by purchase or condemnation, and nothing contained in such a franchise shall be construed to contract away, modify or abridge either for a term or in perpetuity the municipality’s right of eminent domain in respect to any public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6263.

No franchise granted under this chapter shall ever be given any value before any court or other public authority in any proceeding of any character in excess of the cost to the grantee of the necessary publication and any other sum paid by it to the municipality therefor at the time of acquisition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6264.

Every franchise granted pursuant to this chapter, except when a definite term therefor is specified in the ordinance granting it, is indeterminate, that is to say, every such franchise shall endure in full force and effect until, with the consent of the Public Utilities Commission, it is voluntarily surrendered or abandoned by its possessor, or until the State or some municipal or public corporation purchases by voluntary agreement or condemns and takes under the power of eminent domain, all property actually used and useful in the exercise of the franchise and situate within the territorial limits of the State, municipal, or public corporation purchasing or condemning such property, or until the franchise is forfeited for noncompliance with its terms by the possessor thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 817.)
-------------------------------------------

6265.

Every gas franchise granted pursuant to this chapter confers upon the grantee the right to use, or to lay and use, gas pipes and appurtenances for the purpose of transmitting and distributing gas; every oil franchise so granted confers upon the grantee thereof the right to use, or lay and use, oil pipes and appurtenances for the purpose of transmitting and distributing oil or products thereof; every industrial gas franchise so granted confers upon the grantee the right to use, or lay and use, industrial gas pipelines and appurtenances for the purpose of transmitting and distributing industrial gas; every water franchise so granted confers upon the grantee thereof the right to use, or to lay and use, pipes, ditches, flumes, conduits, and appurtenances for the purpose of transmitting and distributing water; and every electric franchise so granted confers upon the grantee thereof the right to use, or to construct and use, poles, wires or conduits and appurtenances for the purpose of transmitting and distributing electricity for all purposes, under, along, across, or upon the public streets, ways, alleys, and places as they now or hereafter exist within the municipality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 197, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Duties and Liabilities of Grantee [6291. - 6302.]

6291.

If the grantee of any franchise granted under this chapter fails, neglects or refuses to comply with any of the provisions or conditions prescribed in this chapter, and does not within ten (10) days after written demand for compliance begin the work of compliance, or after such beginning does not prosecute the work with due diligence to completion, the municipality, by its legislative body, may declare the franchise forfeited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6292.

Any municipality may sue in its own name for the forfeiture of any franchise granted pursuant to this chapter, in the event of noncompliance with any of the conditions thereof by the grantee, its successors, or assigns.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6293.

The grantee shall pay to the municipality a sum of money sufficient to reimburse it for all publication expenses incurred by it in connection with the granting of the franchise. Such payment shall be made within thirty (30) days after the municipality furnishes the grantee with a written statement of the expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.

The grantee of a franchise under this chapter shall construct, install, and maintain all pipes, conduits, poles, wires, and appurtenances in accordance and in conformity with all of the ordinances and rules adopted by the legislative body of the municipality in the exercise of its police powers and not in conflict with the paramount authority of the State, and, as to state highways, subject to the laws relating to the location and maintenance of such facilities therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.

The grantee shall pay to the municipality on demand the cost of all repairs to public property made necessary by any of the operations of the grantee under the franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.

The grantee shall indemnify and hold harmless the municipality and its officers from all liability for damages proximately resulting from any operations under the franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6297.

The grantee shall remove or relocate without expense to the municipality any facilities installed, used, and maintained under the franchise if and when made necessary by any lawful change of grade, alignment, or width of any public street, way, alley, or place, including the construction of any subway or viaduct, by the municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6298.

The grantee shall file with the legislative body of the municipality within thirty (30) days after any sale, transfer, assignment, or lease of the franchise or any part thereof, or any of the rights or privileges granted thereby, written evidence of the transaction certified to by the grantee or its duly authorized officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6299.

The grantee shall file with the clerk of the municipality, within three (3) months after the expiration of the calendar year, or fractional calendar year, following the date of the granting of the franchise and within three (3) months after the expiration of each calendar year thereafter, a verified statement showing in detail the total gross receipts of the grantee, its successors, or assigns during the preceding calendar year or fractional calendar year from the sale of the utility service for which the franchise was granted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6300.

The grantee shall pay to the municipality within fifteen (15) days after the time for filing its statement of gross receipts, in lawful money of the United States, the specified percentage of its gross receipts for the calendar year or fractional calendar year covered by the statement. Any neglect, omission, or refusal by the grantee to file the verified statement, or to pay the percentage at the times or in the manner provided constitutes grounds for the declaration of a forfeiture of the franchise and of all rights thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

(a) The grantee of a franchise under this chapter may be required to file a bond running to the municipality approved by the legislative body, in a penal sum prescribed by the legislative body and set forth in the resolution of intention to grant the franchise, conditioned that the grantee shall well and truly observe, fulfill, and perform each term and condition of the franchise, and that in case of any breach of condition of the bond the amount of the penal sum therein named shall be recoverable.

(b) The bond, if required by the legislative body, shall be filed with the legislative body within five days after the date of the granting of the franchise. If the bond is not so filed, or does not receive the approval of the legislative body, the franchise may be refused or forfeited and any money paid to the municipality in connection therewith shall be retained by the municipality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

The grantee of a franchise under this chapter shall be liable to the granting municipality for all damages proximately resulting from the failure of the grantee well and faithfully to observe and perform any provision of the franchise and any provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Municipal Public Lands Use Surcharge [6350. - 6354.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Intent [6350. - 6350.]

6350.

There is hereby created a surcharge to be applied to natural gas and electricity transported over utility and nonutility transmission or distribution systems, or both, constructed under, along, across, or upon the public streets, ways, alleys, and places within a municipality, to replace, but not increase, franchise fees that would have been collected pursuant to this division if not for changes in the regulatory environment such as the “unbundling” of the gas industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 233, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [6351. - 6351.]

6351.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Municipality” includes counties.

(b) “Energy transporter” means and includes every utility and nonutility owner or operator, or both, of a natural gas or electric transmission or distribution system, or both, subject to a franchise agreement executed pursuant to this division, provided that proprietary gas pipelines whose franchise fees are set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 6231) of Chapter 2 shall not be covered by this chapter.

(c) “Transportation customer” means every person, firm, or corporation, other than the State of California or a political subdivision thereof, transporting gas or electricity on an energy transporter’s transmission or distribution system, or both, when the gas or electricity was purchased by the transportation customer from a third party. Transportation customer shall not include one gas utility transporting gas, for end use in its commission designated service area through another gas utility’s service area, nor shall transportation customer include a utility transporting its own gas through its own gas transmission or distribution system, or both, for purposes of generating electricity or for use in its own operations. In addition, “transportation customer” shall not include a cogeneration or nonutility generation facility when the facility transports electricity through its own electric transmission or distribution system or otherwise delivers electricity in the manner described in Section 218.

(d) “Surcharge” means a municipal surcharge for the use of public lands by a transportation customer as defined in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Surcharge [6352. - 6353.]

6352.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a transportation customer who receives transportation service on a natural gas or electric transmission or distribution system, or both, subject to a franchise agreement executed pursuant to this division from an energy transporter shall be subject to a surcharge as defined in Section 6353. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no county shall impose a surcharge pursuant to this chapter in an incorporated area.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the surcharge assessed for gas used to generate electricity by a nonutility facility shall be the same as the surcharge assessed for gas used to generate electricity by the electric utility for that quantity of gas described in Section 454.4. The surcharge amount for electricity shall not apply to the sale of electricity from a cogeneration or nonutility facility to an entity for resale to a retail customer.

(c) Nothing in this chapter permits a municipality to recover surcharges imposed pursuant to this chapter on the commodity cost of gas or electricity transported for transportation customers in addition to franchise fees calculated on the imputed value of the same quantities of gas or electricity. If a municipality has a franchise agreement with an energy transporter that requires the energy transporter to pay a franchise fee based upon an imputed value for the commodity cost of gas or electricity transported but not sold by the energy transporter, the energy transporter may apply the surcharge imposed by this chapter toward the amount of the franchise fee due under the franchise agreement.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall in any way affect the rights of the parties to existing franchise agreements executed pursuant to this division that are in force on the effective date of this chapter.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the surcharge shall not apply to corporations transporting natural gas pursuant to a “gas transportation only” agreement in effect prior to January 1, 1986.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an energy transporter of gas that is required to obtain a franchise agreement with a municipality, and that is subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, shall not be required to collect the surcharge imposed by this chapter, but shall be required to negotiate with the municipality under the provisions of this division, franchise fees that recover amounts equivalent to those amounts that would otherwise have been recovered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

6353.

For purpose of calculating the surcharge required in Section 6352, the energy transporter shall do all of the following:

(a) For each transportation customer, determine the volume of transported gas or electricity, in therms or kilowatt hours respectively, subject to the surcharge.

(b) Determine the weighted average cost of the energy transporter’s gas or electricity. For gas, the energy transporter shall use its tariffed core subscription weighted average cost of gas (WACOG) exclusive of any California sourced franchise fee factor. For electricity, the energy transporter shall use that portion of the otherwise applicable utility rate or charge which, pursuant to commissioner order, is removed from the bill of a retail electric customer who has elected direct access to reflect the fact that the customer is purchasing energy from a nonutility provider exclusive of any California sourced franchise fee factor. For an energy transporter that does not provide gas or electricity at a commission tariffed rate, the energy transporter shall use the equivalent tariffed rate of the commission regulated energy transporter operating in the same service area.

(c) Determine a product for each transportation customer by multiplying the volume determined pursuant to subdivision (a) by the weighted average cost determined pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Determine the surcharge applicable to each transportation customer by multiplying the product determined pursuant to subdivision (c) by the sum of the franchise fee factor plus any franchise fee surcharge authorized for the energy transporter as approved by the commission in the energy transporter’s most recent proceeding in which those factors and surcharges were set. An energy transporter not regulated by the commission shall multiply the product determined in subdivision (c) by the franchise fee rate contained in its individual franchise agreement in effect in each municipality.

(e) The surcharge assessed pursuant to this chapter only applies to the end use point.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rights, Restrictions, and Compensation [6354. - 6354.1.]

6354.

(a) Surcharges calculated pursuant to Section 6353 shall be recovered from the transportation customer through the energy transporter’s normal billing process.

(b) Surcharges collected from the transportation customer shall be remitted to the municipality granting a franchise pursuant to this division in the manner and at the time prescribed for payment of franchise fees in the energy transporter’s franchise agreement. In recognition of costs to be incurred by energy transporters in administering the surcharge established by this chapter, the energy transporter may retain interest earned on cash balances resulting from the timing difference between the
 monthly collection of the surcharge and the remittance thereof, as required by individual franchise agreements.

(c) In the event that payment on a transportation customer closed account becomes more than 90 days delinquent, or a transportation customer notifies the utility that they refuse to pay the surcharge, the energy transporter shall, within 30 days, notify the municipality of the delinquency and provide information on the name and address of the delinquent transportation customer and the surcharge amount owed. The energy transporter shall not be liable for these delinquent surcharges.

(d) The municipality, including its authorized officials,
 employees, and agents shall use the delinquent transportation customer information only for the purpose of enforcing the surcharge and shall not disclose the information to any officials, employees, agents, or any third parties who are not responsible for and involved in the enforcement of the municipality’s franchise agreements. Nothing herein precludes the municipality, through appropriate officials, employees, or agents, from contacting the transportation customers in order to collect any surcharges due from the transportation customer.

(e) By March 31 of each year, every person, firm, or corporation that transports gas or electricity to any other person, firm, or corporation within a municipality, upon request of the municipality, shall provide the names and addresses of each of its transportation customers and other
 information for the preceding calendar year as may be necessary for the municipality to enforce its taxes and fees. The municipality, including its authorized employees and agents, shall use the transportation customer information and any other customer specific information only for the purpose of enforcing its taxes and fees and shall not disclose the information to any officials, employees, agents, or any third parties not responsible for, and involved in, the enforcement of the taxes and fees. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the municipality, through appropriate officials, employees, or agents, from contacting the customers in order to collect any taxes and fees due from the customer.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any transportation customer information provided by an energy transporter to a
 municipality pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to a utility user tax ordinance is not a public record within the definitions contained in the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(g) In acknowledgment of the potential for systems startup costs to be incurred by the energy transporters in implementing this chapter, authorization is hereby granted for each energy transporter to retain 10 percent of the added fees collected pursuant to this chapter on transported gas or electricity for systems startup costs not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), provided that the portion of collections withheld by the energy transporter shall be apportioned to all municipalities based upon each municipality’s share of total franchise fees allocated by the transporter
 in the prior calendar year.

(h) Surcharges collected pursuant to this chapter shall be separately identified on the transportation customer’s normal bill. At the request of the energy transporter, the municipality shall publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation announcing the change in method of collecting franchise fees brought about by deregulation. Energy transporters may send out notice to transportation customers announcing the change in method of collecting franchise fees through the surcharge. The mailing costs incurred by the energy transporter shall be considered to be part of the implementation costs referenced in subdivision (g).

(i) In the case of partial payment by a transportation customer, the transportation customer payment shall first be applied to the energy
 transporter charges. Only after all energy transporter charges have been satisfied, shall remaining payment amounts be used to satisfy the municipality’s surcharge requirement.

(j) Energy transporter collection of the surcharge shall begin on or before April 1, 1994. During the interim period between expiration of the targeted sales program and implementation of the energy transporters surcharge collection program, upon request of the municipality, the energy transporter shall provide the municipality with a monthly list of the names and addresses of the transportation customers within the municipality’s jurisdiction, the volume of transported gas in therms, the applicable tariffed core subscription weighted average cost of gas (WACOG) exclusive of any California sourced franchise factor, and the franchise fee factor authorized by the
 commission to enable the municipality to collect the surcharge directly from the transportation customers. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in Section 6352, a municipality is hereby authorized to collect an interim surcharge computed in accordance with Section 6353 until the energy transporter commences billing of the surcharge pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 400.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.1.

As an alternative to the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 6354, an energy transporter may elect to state on each customer’s bill, including both transportation customers and customers receiving bundled services, the amount of that bill which is attributable to local franchise fee charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 487, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Resettlement of Street, Suburban, and Interurban Railroad Franchises [6451. - 6467.]

6451.

The governing or legislative body of any city or city and county having on July 27, 1917, a freeholders’ charter adopted under Section 8 of Article XI of the State Constitution, which charter provides for the resettlement of and the granting of a resettlement franchise to any person, firm, or corporation engaged in operating a public utility in such city or city and county, is empowered to provide for a general resettlement of the franchise rights and to grant a resettlement franchise to any person, firm, or corporation actually engaged in operating a street, suburban, or interurban railroad in the city or city and county, upon written application therefor, and upon such terms
 and conditions as are in this chapter provided, and may, in the resettlement of any such franchise impose other and additional terms and conditions not in conflict with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)